New Jersey, session 222, S1957.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A teaching staff member employed by a board of education shall not input the individually identifiable health information of a student or members of a students family, or conversations concerning such information, into a third party software application managed by an entity that engages in partisan political activity. b.    For purposes of this section: Individually identifiable health information means any information, including genetic or vaccination information, relating to the past, present, or future physical or mental health or condition of an individual that either identifies the individual or could reasonably be used to identify the individual; and Partisan political activity means campaigning, fundraising, and electioneering on behalf of candidates or political parties. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to the first school year next following enactment.